Massachusetts, session 194th, H1736.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 201D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in its entirety the definition of “Attending 
physician” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:— 
''Attending health care provider'', the physician, nurse practitioner or psychiatric nurse 
mental health clinical specialist selected by or assigned to a patient, who has primary 
responsibility for the treatment and care of the patient, in whatever setting medical diagnosis or 
treatment is rendered. Where more than one physician, nurse practitioner or psychiatric nurse 
mental health clinical specialist shares such responsibility, any such physician, nurse practitioner 
or psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist may act as the attending health care 
provider. 

of 3 11  SECTION 2. Section 5 of chapter 201D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting 
after the word “physician”, in line 23, the following:— 
, nurse practitioner or psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist 
SECTION 3. Section 6 of chapter 201D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
out the words “attending physician”, in lines 4 through 5, 7, 11, 12 through 13, and 36, each time 
they appear, and inserting in place thereof the following:— 
attending health care provider 
SECTION 4. Said section 6 of said chapter 201D is hereby further amended by inserting 
after the word “physician”, in line 17, the following:— 
, nurse practitioner or psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist 
SECTION 5. Section 7 of chapter 201D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting 
after the word “physician”, in lines 11 and 14, each time it appears, the following:—  
, nurse practitioner or psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist 
SECTION 6. Said section 7 of said chapter 201D is hereby further amended by striking 
out the words “attending physician”, in lines 17 through 18, and inserting in place thereof the 
following:— 
attending health care provider 
SECTION 7. Section 13 of chapter 201D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking 
out the words “attending physician”, in line 2, and inserting in place thereof the following:— 

of 3 30  attending health care provider 
SECTION 8. Section 14 of chapter 201D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word “physician”, in lines 2 through 3, 6, 7, 9, 10, and 13 through 14, each 
time it appears, the following:— 
, nurse practitioner or psychiatric nurse mental health clinical specialist